Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB226.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protection of Patients and Medical Personnel from Health Care Facility Retaliation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County correctional institution." As defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1 of the 12345678910111213141516171819 act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act. The term includes the facility's administrative personnel, employees, boards and committees of the board and medical staff."Medical personnel." An employee, member of the medical staff or another health care worker of a health care facility."State correctional institution." As defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102.Section 3. Prohibitions.(a) Health care facilities.--A health care facility may not discriminate or retaliate against a patient or medical personnel because the patient or medical personnel has done either of the following:(1) Presented a grievance, complaint or report to the facility, to an entity or agency responsible for accrediting or evaluating the facility, to the medical staff of the facility or to another governmental entity.(2) Initiated, participated or cooperated in an investigation or administrative proceeding related to the quality of care, services or conditions at the facility that is carried out by an entity or agency responsible for accrediting or evaluating the facility or its medical staff or governmental entity.(b) Entities.--An entity that owns or operates a health care facility or another health care facility may not discriminate or retaliate against a person because the person took action under this act.Section 4. Rebuttable presumption relating to patients.Any type of discriminatory treatment of a patient by whom, or upon whose behalf, a grievance or complaint has been submitted 20250HB0226PN0179 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to a governmental entity or received by a health care facility administrator within 180 days of the filing of the grievance or complaint shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the action was taken by the health care facility in retaliation for the filing of the grievance or complaint.Section 5. Rebuttable presumption relating to medical personnel.There shall be a rebuttable presumption that discriminatory action was taken by the health care facility, or by the entity that owns or operates that health care facility, or that owns or operates any other health care facility, in retaliation against medical personnel if responsible staff at the facility or the entity that owns or operates the facility:(1) Had knowledge of the actions.(2) Participated or cooperated with the medical personnel responsible for acts described in section 3.(3) Commits a discriminatory act within 120 days of the filing of the grievance or complaint by the medical personnel.Section 6. Discriminatory treatment.For purposes of this act, discriminatory treatment of medical personnel includes discharge, demotion, suspension or any unfavorable changes in, or breach of, the terms or conditions of a contract, employment or privileges of the medical personnel or the threat of any of the actions.Section 7. Evidence.The presumptions in sections 4 and 5 shall be presumptions affecting the burden of producing evidence as provided in 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to rules of evidence).Section 8. Civil penalties and remedies.20250HB0226PN0179 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Secretary of Health.--Upon a determination by hearing that this act was violated, the Secretary of Health may pursue one or more of the following courses of action:(1) Issue an order requiring the person in violation to cease and desist from engaging in the violation.(2) Suspend or revoke or refuse to issue or renew the certificate or license of the person in violation.(3) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation.(4) Impose another appropriate remedy.(b) Other remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to other remedies or penalties that may be imposed by this act or any other law.Section 9. Criminal penalty.In addition to another penalty assessed under this act or any other law, a person who willfully violates this section commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $20,000.Section 10. Restitution and damages.(a) Employee.--An employee who has been discriminated against in employment under this act shall be entitled to:(1) reinstatement, reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer and the legal costs associated with pursuing the case; or(2) a remedy deemed warranted by a court of competent jurisdiction.(b) Health care worker.--A health care worker who has been discriminated against under this act shall be entitled to:(1) reimbursement for lost income and the legal costs associated with pursuing the case; or(2) a remedy deemed warranted by a court of competent 20250HB0226PN0179 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction.(c) Medical staff.--A member of a medical staff who has been discriminated against under this act shall be entitled to reinstatement, reimbursement for lost income resulting from a change in the terms or conditions of the privileges caused by the acts of the health care facility or the entity that owns or operates a health care facility or another health care facility that is owned or operated by that entity, and the legal costs associated with pursuing the case, or to a remedy deemed warranted by a court of competent jurisdiction.Section 11. Injunctive relief relating to peer review.(a) Right to petition.--The medical staff of a health care facility may petition a court for an injunction to protect a peer review committee from being required to comply with evidentiary demands on a pending peer review hearing from the member of the medical staff who has filed an action under this section, if the evidentiary demands from the complainant would impede the peer review process or endanger the health and safety of patients of the health care facility during the peer review process.(b) In camera review.--Prior to granting an injunction, the court shall conduct an in camera review of the evidence sought to be discovered to determine if a peer review hearing, as authorized by law, would be impeded. If it is determined that the peer review hearing will be impeded, the injunction shall be granted until the peer review hearing is completed.(c) Irreparable harm.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the court, on motion of its own or by a party, from issuing an injunction or other order under this act in the interest of justice for the duration of the peer review 20250HB0226PN0179 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 process to protect the person from irreparable harm.Section 12. Peer review activity.This act may not be construed to limit the ability of the medical staff to carry out its legitimate peer review activities in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 81 (relating to emergency medical services system) or any other law.Section 13. Exemption.This act does not apply to an inmate of a State correctional institution or juvenile facility owned or operated by the State or local government or to an inmate housed in a local detention facility, including a county correctional institution or a juvenile hall, juvenile camp or other juvenile detention facility.Section 14. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0226PN0179 - 6 - 123456789101112131415